Oklahoma, session 2025, SB764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-7-117 of Title 10A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A person with whom a child under two (2) years of age has


been placed pursuant to a court order for the purpose of providing


foster care, if such person is a lactating female, may breastfeed


the child if the person receives authorization from the Department


of Human Services and obtains prior written informed consent from a


biological parent of the child, if obtaining such consent is


practicable as determined by the Department.


B. The Director of Human Services shall promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.

Req. No. 725 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-725 DC 1/19/2025 5:42:53 AM











































Req. No. 725 Page 2